Nevada, session 83, AB554.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 223.492 is hereby amended to read as follows:
223.492 1. The Grant Matching Account is hereby created in
the State General Fund. The Office shall administer the Grant
Matching Account.
2. Money received from:
(a) A direct legislative appropriation to the Grant Matching
Account;
(b) A transfer from the Abandoned Property Trust Account
pursuant to NRS 120A.620; and
(c) A grant, gift or donation to the Grant Matching Account,
 must be deposited in the Grant Matching Account. The interest
and income earned on the money in the Grant Matching Account
must be credited to the Grant Matching Account.
3. [Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, the balance]
Any money remaining in the Grant Matching Account [that has not
been committed for expenditure on or before June 30 of an odd-
numbered fiscal year reverts] at the end of a fiscal year does not
revert to the State General Fund [.] , and the balance in the
Account must be carried forward to the next fiscal year.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
4. All money received from a grant, gift or donation to the
Grant Matching Account:
(a) Must be accounted for separately in the Account; and
(b) Must be expended in accordance with the terms of the gift,
grant or donation . [; and
(c) Does not revert to the State General Fund and must be
carried over into the next fiscal year.]
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)